hr-HR: Metoda pristupa gornjem krevetu: Kose ljestve; Odvojive ljestve; Ugrađene stepenice; Ljestve s toboganom; Pristup nije potreban; Stepenice sa spremištem; Standardne stepenice; Okomite ljestve; Ostalo
th: วิธีเข้าถึงเตียงสองชั้นด้านบน: บันไดแบบเอียง; บันไดแบบถอดได้; บันไดในตัว; บันไดพร้อมสไลเดอร์; ไม่จำเป็นต้องใช้ทางขึ้น; บันไดพร้อมช่องเก็บของ; บันไดมาตรฐาน; บันไดแนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
de: Zugang zum oberen Bett: Schräge Leiter; Abnehmbare Leiter; Integrierte Treppe; Leiter mit Rutsche; Kein Zugang erforderlich; Treppe mit Stauraum; Standardtreppe; Senkrechte Leiter; Sonstige
pt-PT: Método de acesso ao beliche superior: Escada inclinada; Escada amovível; Escada integrada; Escada com escorrega; Sem necessidade de acesso; Escada com espaço de arrumação; Escada padrão; Escada vertical; Outro
pl: Metoda dostępu do górnego łóżka: Drabinka kątowa; Odłączana drabinka; Zintegrowane schody; Drabinka ze zjeżdżalnią; Dostęp niewymagany; Schody ze schowkiem; Standardowe schody; Drabinka pionowa; Inna
en: Top bunk access method: Angled ladder; Detachable ladder; Integrated staircase; Ladder with slide; No access needed; Staircase with storage; Standard staircase; Vertical ladder; Other
it: Metodo di accesso al letto superiore: Scala inclinata; Scala rimovibile; Scala integrata; Scala con scivolo; Nessun accesso necessario; Scala con scomparti contenitore; Scala standard; Scala verticale; Altro
nl: Bovenste stapelbed toegangsmethode: Schuine ladder; Afneembare ladder; Geïntegreerde trap; Ladder met glijbaan; Geen toegang nodig; Trap met opbergruimte; Standaardtrap; Verticale ladder; Overige
bg-BG: Метод за достъп до горното легло: Наклонена стълба; Подвижна стълба; Вградени стълби; Стълба с пързалка; Не е необходим достъп; Стълби с място за съхранение; Стандартни стълби; Вертикална стълба; Друго
ko: 상단 침대 접근 방법: 사선형 사다리; 분리형 사다리; 일체형 계단; 미끄럼틀 포함 사다리; 접근 불필요; 수납형 계단; 기본 계단; 수직 사다리; 기타
ro-RO: Metodă de acces la patul superior: Scară înclinată; Scară detașabilă; Trepte integrate; Scară cu tobogan; Fără acces necesar; Trepte cu spațiu de depozitare; Trepte standard; Scară verticală; Altele
fi: Kulkutapa yläsänkyyn: Viistot tikkaat; Irrotettavat tikkaat; Integroidut portaat; Tikkaat liukumäellä; Ei tarvitse kulkua; Portaat säilytystilalla; Tavalliset portaat; Pystysuorat tikkaat; Muu
ru: Способ доступа к верхней полке: Наклонная лестница; Съёмная лестница; Встроенная лестница; Лестница с горкой; Доступ не требуется; Лестница с ящиками для хранения; Стандартная лестница; Вертикальная лестница; Другое
tr: Üst ranza erişim yöntemi: Eğimli merdiven; Çıkarılabilir merdiven; Entegre merdiven; Kaydıraklı merdiven; Erişim gerekmiyor; Depolama alanlı merdiven; Standart merdiven; Dikey merdiven; Diğer
hu: Felső ágy elérési módja: Ferde létra; Levehető létra; Beépített lépcső; Létra csúszdával; Nincs szükség feljutásra; Lépcső tárolóval; Normál lépcső; Függőleges létra; Egyéb
vi: Phương pháp tiếp cận giường tầng trên: Thang nghiêng; Thang có thể tháo rời; Cầu thang tích hợp; Thang có cầu trượt; Không cần lối lên; Cầu thang có ngăn chứa đồ; Cầu thang tiêu chuẩn; Thang thẳng đứng; Khác
sl-SI: Način dostopa do zgornjega ležišča: Nagnjena lestev; Snemljiva lestev; Vgrajene stopnice; Lestev s toboganom; Dostop ni potreben; Stopnice s prostorom za shranjevanje; Standardne stopnice; Navpična lestev; Drugo
zh-TW: 上舖通道方式: 傾斜梯; 可拆式梯子; 內建樓梯; 附溜滑梯的梯子; 無須通道; 附收納空間樓梯; 標準樓梯; 垂直梯; 其他
lt-LT: Patekimo į viršutinį gultą būdas: Pasvirosios kopėčios; Nuimamos kopėčios; Integruoti laiptai; Kopėčios su čiuožykla; Prieiga nereikalinga; Laiptai su daiktadėžėmis; Standartiniai laiptai; Vertikalios kopėčios; Kita
nb: Tilgangsmetode for øverste køyeseng: Vinklet stige; Avtakbar stige; Integrert trapp; Stige med sklie; Krever ikke tilgang; Trapp med oppbevaring; Standard trapp; Vertikal stige; Annet
el: Μέθοδος πρόσβασης στην επάνω κουκέτα: Κεκλιμένη σκάλα; Αποσπώμενη σκάλα; Ενσωματωμένα σκαλοπάτια; Σκάλα με τσουλήθρα; Δεν απαιτείται πρόσβαση; Σκαλοπάτια με αποθηκευτικό χώρο; Κανονικά σκαλοπάτια; Κάθετη σκάλα; Άλλο
es: Método de acceso a la litera superior: Escalera inclinada; Escalera desmontable; Escaleras integradas; Escalera con tobogán; Sin acceso necesario; Escaleras con almacenamiento; Escaleras estándar; Escalera vertical; Otro
cs: Přístup k horní palandě: Šikmý žebřík; Odnímatelný žebřík; Integrované schůdky; Žebřík se skluzavkou; Bez nutnosti přístupu; Schůdky s úložným prostorem; Standardní schůdky; Svislý žebřík; Jiné
da: Adgangsmetode til overkøje: Vinklet stige; Aftagelig stige; Integreret trappe; Stige med rutsjebane; Ingen adgang nødvendig; Trappe med opbevaring; Standard trappe; Lodret stige; Andet
zh-CN: 上铺进入方式: 倾斜爬梯; 可拆卸爬梯; 一体式楼梯; 带滑梯爬梯; 无需通道; 带储物柜楼梯; 标准楼梯; 垂直爬梯; 其他
fr: Mode d’accès au lit supérieur: Échelle inclinée; Échelle amovible; Escalier intégré; Échelle avec toboggan; Aucun accès nécessaire; Escalier avec rangement; Escalier standard; Échelle verticale; Autre
sk-SK: Metóda prístupu na horné poschodie: Šikmý rebrík; Odnímateľný rebrík; Integrované schodisko; Rebrík so šmykľavkou; Nevyžaduje sa prístup; Schodisko s úložným priestorom; Štandardné schodisko; Zvislý rebrík; Iné
pt-BR: Beliche superior método de acesso: Escada inclinada; Escada removível; Escada integrada; Escada com escorregador; Sem necessidade de acesso; Escada com armazenamento; Escada padrão; Escada vertical; Outros
ja: 上段ベッドへのアクセス方法: 傾斜はしご; 取り外し可能はしご; 一体型階段; すべり台付きはしご; アクセス不要; 収納付き階段; 標準階段; 垂直はしご; その他
sv: Åtkomstmetod för översta våningssängen: Lutande stege; Avtagbar stege; Integrerad trappa; Stege med rutschkana; Ingen åtkomst krävs; Trappa med förvaring; Standardtrappa; Rak stege; Övrigt